Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1023.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1664XC (2) 91 jda/jh S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 282.18, subsection 12, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 12. a. A pupil participating in open enrollment for 3 purposes of receiving educational instruction and course 4 content primarily over the internet in accordance with section 5 256.7, subsection 32 , may participate in any cocurricular or 6 extracurricular activities offered to children in the pupilâs 7 grade or group , and sponsored by the district of residence , 8 under the same conditions and requirements as the pupils 9 enrolled in the district of residence , if the school providing 10 the educational instruction and course content primarily 11 over the internet does not sponsor such cocurricular or 12 extracurricular activities . 13 b. The pupil may participate in not more than two 14 cocurricular or extracurricular activities during a school year 15 unless the resident district approves the studentâs pupilâs 16 participation in additional activities. 17 c. The student pupil shall comply with the eligibility, 18 conduct, and other requirements relating to the activity that 19 are established by the district of residence for any student 20 pupil who applies to participate or who is participating in the 21 activity. 22